Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2406
Proceedings within the exclusive jurisdiction of court; service; jurisdiction over persons.

In proceedings within the jurisdiction of the court where notice is required by this code or by rule, interested persons may be bound by the orders of the court in respect to property in or subject to the laws of this state by notice in conformity with section 30-2220. An order is binding as to all who are given notice of the proceeding though less than all interested persons are notified.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 84, UPC § 3-106.